Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.205

Additional chemists—Appointment—Duties—Compensation.

The director of agriculture may appoint one or more competent graduate chemists to serve as additional chemist of the department of agriculture, who may perform any of the duties required of and under the supervision of the official chemists, and whose compensation shall be fixed by the director.

[ 1981 c 297 s 28.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.